North Carolina, session 2025, SB50.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 54C.
"Carrying Concealed Handguns.
"§ 14-415.35. Carrying concealed handguns.
(a) Carrying Concealed Handgun. – Any person who is a citizen of the United States and
is at least 18 years old may carry a concealed handgun in this State unless provided otherwise by
law.
(b) Offense. – It is unlawful for a person who meets any of the following criteria to carry
a concealed handgun:
(1) Is ineligible to own, possess, or receive a firearm under the provisions of State
or federal law.
(2) Is under indictment for a felony.
(3) Has been adjudicated guilty in any court of a felony, unless (i) the felony is
an offense that pertains to antitrust violations, unfair trade practices, restraints
of trade, or other similar offenses related to the regulation of business practices
or (ii) the person's firearms rights have been restored pursuant to
G.S. 14-415.4 or have been restored in another state pursuant to the laws of
that state.
(4) Is a fugitive from justice.
(5) Is an unlawful user of, or addicted to, marijuana, alcohol, or any depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, or any other controlled substance as defined in 21
U.S.C. § 802.
(6) Is currently or has been previously adjudicated by a court to be lacking mental
capacity or mentally ill. Receipt of previous consultative services or outpatient
treatment alone shall not disqualify any citizen under this subdivision.
*S50-v-4*

(7) Is or has been discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States under
dishonorable conditions.
(8) Except as provided in subdivision (9), (10), or (11) of this subsection, is or
has been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment continued or
suspended sentence for one or more crimes of violence constituting a
misdemeanor, including, but not limited to, a violation of a misdemeanor
under Article 8 of this Chapter except for a violation of G.S. 14-33(a), or a
violation of a misdemeanor under G.S. 14-226.1, 14-258.1, 14-269.2,
14-269.6, 14-277, 14-277.1, 14-283 except for a violation involving fireworks
exempted under G.S. 14-288.2, 14-288.4(a)(1), 14-288.6, 14-288.9, former
14-288.12, former 14-288.13, former 14-288.14, 14-414, 14-415.21(b),
14-415.26(d) within three years prior to the date on which the person is
carrying the weapon, or 14-415.36.
(9) Is or has been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment
continued or suspended sentence for one or more crimes of violence
constituting a misdemeanor under G.S. 14-33(c)(1), 14-33(c)(2), 14-33(c)(3),
14-33(d), 14-134.3, 14-277.3A, 14-318.2, 50B-4.1, or former 14-277.3.
(10) Is prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 922(g) as a
result of a conviction of a misdemeanor crime of domestic violence.
(11) Has been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment continued or
suspended sentence for one or more crimes involving an assault or a threat to
assault a law enforcement officer, probation or parole officer, person
employed at a State or local detention facility, firefighter, emergency medical
technician, medical responder, or emergency department personnel.
(12) Has had entry of a prayer for judgment continued for a criminal offense that
would make it unlawful under this section for the person to carry a concealed
weapon.
(13) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing
for a crime that would make it unlawful under this section for the person to
carry a concealed weapon.
(c) Valid Identification Required; Disclosure to Law Enforcement Officer When
Carrying Concealed. – When carrying a concealed handgun, a person shall also carry valid
identification and shall disclose to any law enforcement officer that the person is carrying a
concealed handgun when approached or addressed by the officer and shall display the proper
identification upon the request of a law enforcement officer.
(d) Penalty. – Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a Class
3 misdemeanor. Any person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a Class 2
misdemeanor for a first offense and is guilty of a Class H felony for a second or subsequent
offense. Any person who violates subsection (c) of this section commits an infraction and shall
be punished in accordance with G.S. 14-3.1.
"§ 14-415.36. Unlawful to carry a concealed weapon into certain areas.
(a) It is unlawful to carry a concealed weapon into the following areas unless provided
otherwise by law:
(1) In an area prohibited by rule adopted under G.S. 120-32.1.
(2) In any area prohibited by 18 U.S.C. § 922 or any other federal law.
(3) In a law enforcement or correctional facility.
(4) On any private premises where notice that carrying a concealed handgun is
prohibited by the posting of a conspicuous notice or statement by the person
in legal possession or control of the premises.
(b) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of an infraction and may be
required to pay a fine up to five hundred dollars ($500.00)."
Page 2 Senate Bill 50-Ratified

SECTION 1.9. G.S. 143-166.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-166.3. Payments; determination.
(a) When any covered person is killed in the line of duty, the Industrial Commission shall
award a death benefit in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) one hundred
and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to be paid to one of the following:
(1) The spouse of the covered person if there is a surviving spouse.
(2) If there is no surviving spouse, then payments shall be made to any surviving
dependent child of the covered person. If there is more than one surviving
dependent child, then the payment shall be made to and equally divided among
all surviving dependent children.
(3) If there is no surviving spouse and no surviving dependent child or children,
then payments shall be made to any surviving dependent parent of the covered
person. If there is more than one surviving dependent parent, then the
payments shall be made to and equally divided between the surviving
dependent parents of the covered person.
(4) If there is no surviving spouse, surviving dependent child, or surviving
dependent parent, then the payment shall be made to the estate of the deceased
covered person.
…
(e) On and after July 1, 2016, when any covered person is murdered in the line of duty,
in addition to the award under subsection (a) of this section, the Industrial Commission shall
award a death benefit in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) one hundred
and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to be paid to one of the following:
(1) The spouse of the covered person if there is a surviving spouse.
(2) If there is no surviving spouse, then payments shall be made to any surviving
dependent child of the covered person. If there is more than one surviving
dependent child, then the payment shall be made to and equally divided among
all surviving dependent children.
(3) If there is no surviving spouse and no surviving dependent child or children,
then payments shall be made to any surviving dependent parent of the covered
person. If there is more than one surviving dependent parent, then the
payments shall be made to and equally divided between the surviving
dependent parents of the covered person.
(4) If there is no surviving spouse, surviving dependent child, or surviving
dependent parent, then the payment shall be made to the estate of the deceased
covered person.
…."
SECTION 2. Article 54B of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-415.10A. Purpose.
While G.S. 14-415.35 makes it lawful to carry a concealed weapon in this State without
obtaining a concealed handgun permit, it is often convenient to have a concealed handgun permit
for the purpose of reciprocity when traveling in another state, to make the purchase of a firearm
more efficient, or for various other reasons. Therefore, the State of North Carolina shall continue
to make a concealed handgun permit available to any person who applies for and is eligible to
receive a concealed handgun permit pursuant to this Article. For the avoidance of doubt the
concealed handgun permit system maintained pursuant to this Article does not prevent a person
from carrying a concealed handgun pursuant to Article 54C of this Chapter."
SECTION 3. G.S. 14-415.12(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The sheriff shall deny a permit to an applicant who:
Senate Bill 50-Ratified Page 3

(1) Is ineligible to own, possess, or receive a firearm under the provisions of State
or federal law.
(2) Is under indictment or against whom a finding of probable cause exists for a
felony.
(3) Has been adjudicated guilty in any court of a felony, unless: (i) the felony is
an offense that pertains to antitrust violations, unfair trade practices, or
restraints of trade, or (ii) the person's firearms rights have been restored
pursuant to G.S. 14-415.4.
(4) Is a fugitive from justice.
(5) Is an unlawful user of, or addicted to marijuana, alcohol, or any depressant,
stimulant, or narcotic drug, or any other controlled substance as defined in 21
U.S.C. § 802.
(6) Is currently, or has been previously adjudicated by a court or administratively
determined by a governmental agency whose decisions are subject to judicial
review to be, lacking mental capacity or mentally ill. Receipt of previous
consultative services or outpatient treatment alone shall not disqualify an
applicant under this subdivision.
(7) Is or has been discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States under
conditions other than honorable.dishonorable conditions.
(8) Except as provided in subdivision (8a), (8b), or (8c) of this section, is or has
been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment continued or
suspended sentence for one or more crimes of violence constituting a
misdemeanor, including but not limited to, a violation of a misdemeanor under
Article 8 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes except for a violation of
G.S. 14-33(a), or a violation of a misdemeanor under G.S. 14-226.1, 4-258.1,
14-269.2, 14-269.3, 14-269.4, 14-269.6, 14-277, 14-277.1, 14-277.2, 14-283
except for a violation involving fireworks exempted under G.S. 14-414,
14-288.2, 14-288.4(a)(1), 14-288.6, 14-288.9, former 14-288.12, former
14-288.13, former 14-288.14, 14-415.21(b), or 14-415.26(d) within three
years prior to the date on which the application is submitted.
(8a) Is or has been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment
continued or suspended sentence for one or more crimes of violence
constituting a misdemeanor under G.S. 14-32.5, 14-33(c)(1), 14-33(c)(2),
14-33(c)(3), 14-33(d), 14-277.3A, 14-318.2, 14-134.3, 50B-4.1, or former
G.S. 14-277.3.
(8b) Is prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 922(g) as a
result of a conviction of a misdemeanor crime of domestic violence.
(8c) Has been adjudicated guilty of or received a prayer for judgment continued or
suspended sentence for one or more crimes involving an assault or a threat to
assault a law enforcement officer, probation or parole officer, person
employed at a State or local detention facility, firefighter, emergency medical
technician, medical responder, or emergency department personnel.
(9) Has had entry of a prayer for judgment continued for a criminal offense which
would disqualify the person from obtaining a concealed handgun permit.
(10) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing
for a crime which would disqualify him from obtaining a concealed handgun
permit.
(11) Has been convicted of an impaired driving offense under G.S. 20-138.1,
20-138.2, or 20-138.3 within three years prior to the date on which the
application is submitted."
SECTION 4. G.S. 14-269 reads as rewritten:
Page 4 Senate Bill 50-Ratified

"§ 14-269. Carrying concealed weapons.
(a) It shall be Except as otherwise provided by law, it is unlawful for any person willfully
and intentionally to carry concealed about his or her person any bowie knife, dirk, dagger, slung
shot, loaded cane, metallic knuckles, razor, shuriken, stun gun, or other deadly weapon of like
kind, except when the person is on the person's own premises. For purposes of this subsection,
the term "weapon" does not include a firearm.
(a1) It shall be unlawful for any person willfully and intentionally to carry concealed about
his or her person any pistol or gun except in the following circumstances:firearm, except a
handgun carried pursuant to Article 54B or Article 54C of this Chapter.
(1) The person is on the person's own premises.
(2) The deadly weapon is a handgun, the person has a concealed handgun permit
issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter or considered valid
under G.S. 14-415.24, and the person is carrying the concealed handgun in
accordance with the scope of the concealed handgun permit as set out in
G.S. 14-415.11(c).
(3) The deadly weapon is a handgun and the person is a military permittee as
defined under G.S. 14-415.10(2a) who provides to the law enforcement
officer proof of deployment as required under G.S. 14-415.11(a).
(a2) This prohibition does not apply to a person who has a concealed handgun permit
issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter, has a concealed handgun permit
considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or is exempt from obtaining a permit pursuant to
G.S. 14-415.25, provided the weapon is a handgun, is in a closed compartment or container
within the person's locked vehicle, and the vehicle is in a parking area that is owned or leased by
State government. A person may unlock the vehicle to enter or exit the vehicle, provided the
handgun remains in the closed compartment at all times and the vehicle is locked immediately
following the entrance or exit.
(a3) Some of the exceptions listed in subsection (b) of this section include a condition that
the person have a concealed handgun permit. In those circumstances, a person must still have a
concealed handgun permit issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter or considered
valid under G.S. 14-415.24 to qualify as an exception.
…
(b1) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that:if all of the following apply:
(1) The weapon was not a firearm;
(2) The defendant was engaged in, or on the way to or from, an activity in which
the defendant legitimately used the weapon;weapon.
(3) The defendant possessed the weapon for that legitimate use; anduse.
(4) The defendant did not use or attempt to use the weapon for an illegal purpose.
The burden of proving this defense is on the defendant.
(b2) It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that:
(1) The deadly weapon is a handgun;
(2) The defendant is a military permittee as defined under G.S. 14-415.10(2a);
and
(3) The defendant provides to the court proof of deployment as defined under
G.S. 14-415.10(3a).
(c) Any Except as otherwise provided by law, any person violating the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Any person violating the
provisions of subsection (a1) of this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor for the first
offense and a Class H felony for a second or subsequent offense. A violation of subsection (a1)
of this section punishable under G.S. 14-415.21(a) is not punishable under this section.
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 14-269.1 reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 50-Ratified Page 5

"§ 14-269.1. Confiscation and disposition of deadly weapons.
Upon conviction of any person for violation of G.S. 14-269, G.S. 14-269.7, 14-269.7,
14-415.35(b), or any other offense involving the use of a deadly weapon of a type referred to in
G.S. 14-269, weapon, including a firearm, the deadly weapon with reference to which the
defendant shall have been convicted shall be ordered confiscated and disposed of by the presiding
judge at the trial in one of the following ways in the discretion of the presiding judge.
…."
SECTION 6. G.S. 14-269.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269.3. Carrying weapons into assemblies and establishments where alcoholic
beverages are sold and consumed.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person consuming alcohol, or at any time while the person
has remaining in the person's body any alcohol or in the person's blood a controlled substance
previously consumed, to carry any gun, rifle, or pistol into any assembly where a fee has been
charged for admission thereto, or into any establishment in which alcoholic beverages are sold
and consumed. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1
misdemeanor.
(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) A person exempted from the provisions of G.S. 14-269.
(2) The owner or lessee of the premises or business establishment.
(3) A person participating in the event, if the person is carrying a gun, rifle, or
pistol with the permission of the owner, lessee, or person or organization
sponsoring the event.
(4) A person registered or hired as a security guard by the owner, lessee, or person
or organization sponsoring the event.
(5) A person carrying a handgun if the person has a valid concealed handgun
permit issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter, has a concealed
handgun permit considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or is exempt from
obtaining a permit pursuant to G.S. 14-415.25. This subdivision shall not be
construed to permit a person to carry a handgun on any premises where the
person in legal possession or control of the premises has posted a conspicuous
notice prohibiting the carrying of a concealed handgun on the premises in
accordance with G.S. 14-415.11(c)."
SECTION 7. G.S. 14-269.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269.4. Weapons on certain State property and in courthouses.
It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, or carry, whether openly or concealed, any
deadly weapon, not used solely for instructional or officially sanctioned ceremonial purposes in
the State Capitol Building, the Executive Mansion, the Western Residence of the Governor, or
on the grounds of any of these buildings, and in any building housing any court of the General
Court of Justice. If a court is housed in a building containing nonpublic uses in addition to the
court, then this prohibition shall apply only to that portion of the building used for court purposes
while the building is being used for court purposes.
This section shall not apply to any of the following:
…
(6) A person with a permit issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter,
with a permit considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or who is exempt from
obtaining a permit pursuant to G.S. 14-415.25, who has a firearm A person
carrying a concealed handgun in a closed compartment or container within the
person's locked vehicle or in a locked container securely affixed to the person's
vehicle. A person may unlock the vehicle to enter or exit the vehicle provided
the remains in the closed compartment at all times and the vehicle is locked
immediately following the entrance or exit.
Page 6 Senate Bill 50-Ratified

(7) Any person who carries or possesses an ordinary pocket knife, as defined in
G.S. 14-269(d), carried in a closed position into the State Capitol Building or
on the grounds of the State Capitol Building.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor."
SECTION 8. G.S. 14-277.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-277.2. Weapons at parades, etc., prohibited.
…
(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to concealed carry of a handgun at a
parade or funeral procession by a person with a valid permit issued in accordance with Article
54B of this Chapter, with a permit considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or who is exempt from
obtaining a permit pursuant to G.S. 14-415.25. procession. This subsection shall not be construed
to permit a person to carry a concealed handgun on any premises where the person in legal
possession or control of the premises has posted a conspicuous notice prohibiting the carrying of
a concealed handgun on the premises in accordance with G.S. 14-415.11(c)."
SECTION 9. G.S. 14-401.24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-401.24. Unlawful possession and use of unmanned aircraft systems.
…
(c) The following definitions apply to this section:
…
(5) Weapon. – Those weapons specified in G.S. 14-269, 14-269.2, 14-284.1, or
14-288.8 and any other object object, including a firearm, capable of inflicting
serious bodily injury or death when used as a weapon.
…."
SECTION 9.1.(a) G.S. 14-34.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-34.5. Assault with a firearm on a law enforcement, probation, or parole officer, or
on a member of the North Carolina National Guard, or on a person employed at
a State or local detention facility.
(a) Any person who commits an assault with a firearm upon a law enforcement officer,
probation officer, or parole officer while the officer is in the performance of his or her duties is
guilty of a Class D felony.
(a1) Any person who commits an assault with a firearm upon a member of the North
Carolina National Guard while the member is in the performance of his or her duties is guilty of
a Class D felony.
(b) Anyone who commits an assault with a firearm upon a person who is employed at a
detention facility operated under the jurisdiction of the State or a local government while the
employee is in the performance of the employee's duties is guilty of a Class D felony.any of the
following persons who are in the performance of their duties is guilty of a Class B1 felony:
(1) A law enforcement officer.
(2) A probation officer.
(3) A parole officer.
(4) A member of the North Carolina National Guard.
(5) An employee of a detention facility operated under the jurisdiction of the State
or a local government.
(6) An emergency medical technician or other emergency health care provider.
(7) A medical responder.
(8) A firefighter.
(9) A telecommunicator employed by a law enforcement agency."
SECTION 9.1.(b) G.S. 14-34.6(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Unless a person's conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing
greater punishment, a person is guilty of a Class D felony if the person violates subsection (a) of
this section against a person not otherwise covered under G.S. 14-34.5 and uses a firearm."
Senate Bill 50-Ratified Page 7

SECTION 10. G.S. 14-409.40 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-409.40. Statewide uniformity of local regulation.
…
(f) Nothing contained in this section prohibits municipalities or counties from application
of their authority under G.S. 153A-129, 160A-189, 14-269, 14-269.2, 14-269.3, 14-269.4,
14-277.2, 14-415.11, 14-415.23, 14-415.35, including prohibiting the possession of firearms in
public-owned buildings, on the grounds or parking areas of those buildings, or in public parks or
recreation areas, except nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a person from storing a firearm
within a motor vehicle while the vehicle is on these grounds or areas. Nothing contained in this
section prohibits municipalities or counties from exercising powers provided by law in states of
emergency declared under Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 11. G.S. 14-415.4(e)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) The petitioner is under indictment for a felony or a finding of probable cause
exists against the petitioner for a felony."
SECTION 12. G.S. 14-415.11(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Any person who has a concealed handgun permit may carry a concealed handgun
unless otherwise specifically prohibited by law. The person shall carry the permit together with
valid identification whenever the person is carrying a concealed handgun, shall disclose to any
law enforcement officer that the person holds a valid permit and is carrying a concealed handgun
when approached or addressed by the officer, and shall display both the permit and the proper
identification upon the request of a law enforcement officer. In addition to these requirements, a
military permittee whose permit has expired during deployment may carry a concealed handgun
during the 90 days following the end of deployment and before the permit is renewed provided
the permittee also displays proof of deployment to any law enforcement officer."
SECTION 13. G.S. 14-415.22 is repealed.
SECTION 14. G.S. 74E-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74E-6. Oaths, powers, and authority of company police officers.
…
(c) All Company Police. – Company police officers, while in the performance of their
duties of employment, have the same powers as municipal and county police officers to make
arrests for both felonies and misdemeanors and to charge for infractions on any of the following:
(1) Real property owned by or in the possession and control of their employer.
(2) Real property owned by or in the possession and control of a person who has
contracted with the employer to provide on-site company police security
personnel services for the property.
(3) Any other real property while in continuous and immediate pursuit of a person
for an offense committed upon property described in subdivisions (1) or (2)
of this subsection.
Company police officers shall have, if duly authorized by the superior officer in charge, the
authority to carry concealed weapons pursuant to and in conformity with G.S. 14-269(b)(4) and
(5).G.S. 14-269(b)(4) and (b)(5) and G.S. 14-415.35.
…."
SECTION 15. G.S. 74G-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74G-6. Oaths, powers, and authority of campus police officers.
…
(d) Concealed Weapons. – Campus police officers shall have, if duly authorized by their
campus police agency and by the sheriff of the county in which the campus police agency is
located, the authority to carry concealed weapons pursuant to and in conformity with
G.S. 14-269(b)(5).G.S. 14-269(b)(5) and G.S. 14-415.35.
…."
Page 8 Senate Bill 50-Ratified

SECTION 15.5. G.S. 14-415.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a2) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section and discharges a firearm during
the commission or attempted commission of a felony under (i) this Chapter or (ii) Article 5 of
Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is guilty of a Class C felony."
SECTION 15.6. G.S. 14-415.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.1. Possession of firearms, etc., by felon prohibited.
(a) It shall be is unlawful for any person who has been convicted of a felony to purchase,
own, possess, or have in his the person's custody, care, or control any firearm or any weapon of
mass death and destruction as defined in G.S. 14-288.8(c). For the purposes of this section, a
firearm is (i) any weapon, including a starter gun, which will or is designed to or may readily be
converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive, or its frame or receiver, or (ii) any
firearm muffler or firearm silencer. This section does not apply to an antique firearm, as defined
in G.S. 14-409.11.
Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be punished as subsection is guilty
of a Class G felon.felony.
(a1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section during the commission or
attempted commission of a felony under (i) this Chapter or (ii) Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes is guilty of a Class F felony.
(b) Prior convictions which cause disentitlement under this section shall only include:
(1) Felony convictions in North Carolina that occur before, on, or after December
1, 1995; and
(2) Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 487, s. 3, effective December 1, 1995.
(3) Violations of criminal laws of other states or of the United States that occur
before, on, or after December 1, 1995, and that are substantially similar to the
crimes covered in subdivision (1) which are punishable where committed by
imprisonment for a term exceeding one year.
When a person is charged under this section, records of prior convictions of any offense, whether
in the courts of this State, or in the courts of any other state or of the United States, shall be
admissible in evidence for the purpose of proving a violation of this section. The term
"conviction" is defined as a final judgment in any case in which felony punishment, or
imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, as the case may be, is authorized, without regard to
the plea entered or to the sentence imposed. A judgment of a conviction of the defendant or a
plea of guilty by the defendant to such an offense certified to a superior court of this State from
the custodian of records of any state or federal court shall be prima facie evidence of the facts so
certified.
(c) The indictment charging the defendant under the terms of this section shall be separate
from any indictment charging him with other offenses related to or giving rise to a charge under
this section. An indictment which charges the person with violation of this section must set forth
the date that the prior offense was committed, the type of offense and the penalty therefor, and
the date that the defendant was convicted or plead guilty to such offense, the identity of the court
in which the conviction or plea of guilty took place and the verdict and judgment rendered
therein.
(d) This section does not apply to a person who, pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction in
which the conviction occurred, has been pardoned or has had his or her firearms rights restored
if such restoration of rights could also be granted under North Carolina law.
(e) This section does not apply and there is no disentitlement under this section if the
felony conviction is a violation under the laws of North Carolina, another state, or the United
States that pertains to antitrust violations, unfair trade practices, or restraints of trade."
SECTION 16. G.S. 113-136 reads as rewritten:
"§ 113-136. Enforcement authority of inspectors and protectors; refusal to obey or allow
inspection by inspectors and protectors.
Senate Bill 50-Ratified Page 9

…
(d) Inspectors and protectors are additionally authorized to arrest without warrant under
the terms of G.S. 15A-401(b) for felonies, for breaches of the peace, for assaults upon them or in
their presence, and for other offenses evincing a flouting of their authority as enforcement
officers or constituting a threat to public peace and order which would tend to subvert the
authority of the State if ignored. In particular, they are authorized, subject to the direction of the
administrative superiors, to arrest for violations of G.S. 14-223, 14-225, 14-269, and
14-277.14-277, and 14-415.35.
…."
SECTION 16.7. The University of North Carolina Board of Governors shall develop
a scholarship program for any child, if the child is at least 17 years old but not yet 28 years old,
whose parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian is a law enforcement officer, correctional officer,
firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or rescue squad worker who is permanently and totally disabled
as a direct result of a traumatic injury sustained in the line of duty.
The scholarship program shall provide assistance with tuition, fees, educational
supplies, and boarding expenses not covered under Chapter 115B of the General Statutes and
shall be available for both undergraduate and graduate programs.
The Board of Governors shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee on the establishment of the program no later than July 1, 2026.
SECTION 17. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 18. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 12th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Page 10 Senate Bill 50-Ratified